Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. In General

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-1-101.
Short title; applicability of provisions; conflicting penalties.

This act may be cited as the Wyoming Criminal Code.

This act does not apply to crimes committed prior to the effective date of this act. Prosecutions for a crime shall be governed by the law in effect on the date when the crime occurred. A crime was committed prior to the effective date of this act if any of the elements of the crime occurred prior to the effective date of this act.

In a case pending on or after the effective date of this act, involving a crime committed prior to the effective date, if the penalty under this act for the crime is different from the penalty under prior law, the court shall impose the lesser sentence.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “of 1982” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

Section 6, ch. 75, Laws 1982 and section 8, ch. 171, Laws 1983 make the act effective on July 1, 1983.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means, literally, Laws 1982, ch. 75, as amended by Laws 1983, ch. 171. The reference, however, was probably meant to be to §§

6-1-101

through

6-10-203

.

Sentencing taking place after July 1, 1983 under provisions of new Criminal Code. —

Although, at the time he pleaded guilty to grand larceny, the defendant was informed that he could receive a sentence of up to 10 years under former law, his sentence, which took place after the effective date of the new Criminal Code, should have been under the provisions of the new code, inasmuch as the legislative intent is to have the law in effect prior to July 1, 1983 control all aspects of the prosecution of a crime in which any of its elements occurred prior to that date, with a single exception — any original sentence imposed after July 1, 1983 must be the lesser of that provided for the crime where the new code and the old code diverge. Attletweedt v. State, 684 P.2d 812,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1984).

Conflicting-penalty provision inapplicable to contention that defendant charged with wrong crime. —

The defendant, who was properly charged with, and convicted of, manslaughter, but who contended throughout his trial and appeal that he should have been charged with vehicular homicide, was properly sentenced under the manslaughter statute. Both the previous (§ 6-4-107) and the current (§

6-2-105

) statutes proscribing manslaughter provide for a sentence of up to 20 years in the state penitentiary. The defendant's interpretation and application of subsection (c) was inappropriate; he was never charged with or convicted of vehicular homicide. Sodergren v. State, 715 P.2d 170,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1986).

Three-to-seven year forgery sentence proper. —

Inasmuch as the defendant's sentence was three to seven years, the sentence was within “the lesser” of the penalties provided for the crime of forgery under the present Criminal Code and the crime of forgery as defined when the crime was committed in 1982. Accordingly, the argument that subsection (c) made improper the sentence was without merit. Binger v. State, 712 P.2d 349,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Johnson v. State, 695 P.2d 638,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 446

(Wyo. 1985); Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985); Lewis v. State, 709 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 619

(Wyo. 1985); Roush v. State, 2014 WY 45,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Apr 8, 2014).

Quoted

in

Schuler v. State, 771 P.2d 1217,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Wright v. State, 718 P.2d 35,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1986); Pote v. State, 733 P.2d 1018,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1987); Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989); Sarr v. State, 2007 WY 140, 166 P.3d 891,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Aug. 29, 2007).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Dismissal of state criminal charge in furtherance of, or in interest of, justice, 71 ALR5th 1.

§ 6-1-102.
Common-law crimes abolished; common-law defenses retained.

Common-law crimes are abolished. No conduct constitutes a crime unless it is described as a crime in this act or in another statute of this state. This section does not limit the power of the court to:

Punish for contempt or to employ any sanction authorized by law for the enforcement of an order lawfully entered or a civil judgment or decree; or

Use case law as an interpretive aid and in the construction of this act.

Common-law defenses are retained unless otherwise provided by this act.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following same catchline in notes to §

6-1-101

.

Common-law defense of parental discipline was available to one prosecuted under §

6-2-503

(child abuse).

Requiring the defendant to prove this defense was not unconstitutional.
Keser v. State, 706 P.2d 263,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1985).

Jury instructions. —

Although the district court erred by instructing the jury as to common law parental duties that were not encompassed within the charged crime of felony murder based on child abuse, the error was harmless because the completed verdict form showed juror unanimity as to defendant's guilt on all of the theories properly alleged; the judgment and sentence had to be amended to reflect the fact that only one charge was brought, that defendant was bound over and arraigned and pled to only one charge, and that he was therefore convicted of only one charge.
Yellowbear v. State, 2008 WY 4, 174 P.3d 1270,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2008).

Quoted

in

Bouwkamp v. State, 833 P.2d 486,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1992).

Stated

in

Mares v. State, 939 P.2d 724,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Bush v. State, 908 P.2d 963,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1995); Holloman v. State, 2002 WY 117, 51 P.3d 214,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

For article, “A Comprehensive Treatise on Contempt of Court in Wyoming,” see
15 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Automatism or unconsciousness as defense to criminal charge, 27 ALR4th 1067.

Acts in self-defense as within provision of liability insurance policy expressly excluding coverage for damage or injury intended or expected by insured, 34 ALR4th 761.

Entrapment to commit traffic offense, 34 ALR4th 1167.

Public school teacher's self-defense, or defense of another, as justification, in dismissal proceedings, for use or threat of use of force against student, 37 ALR4th 842.

Fact that weapon was acquired for self-defense or to prevent its use against defendant as defense in prosecution for violation of state statute prohibiting persons under indictment for, or convicted of, crime from acquiring, having, carrying or using firearms or weapons, 39 ALR4th 967.

Truth as defense to state charge of criminal intimidation, extortion, blackmail, threats and the like, based upon threats to disclose information about victim, 39 ALR4th 1011.

Trespass: state prosecution for unauthorized entry or occupation, for public demonstration purposes, of business, industrial or utility premises, 41 ALR4th 773.

Burden of proof as to entrapment defense — state cases, 52 ALR4th 775.

Construction and application of statutes justifying the use of force to prevent the use of force against another, 71 ALR4th 940.

Defense of necessity, duress or coercion in prosecution for violation of state narcotics laws, 1 ALR5th 938.

“Choice of evils,” necessity, duress, or similar defense to state or local criminal charges based on acts of public protest, 3 ALR5th 521.

Entrapment as defense to charge of selling or supplying narcotics where government agents supplied narcotics to defendant and purchased them from him, 9 ALR5th 464.

Right of criminal defendant to raise entrapment defense based on having dealt with other party who was entrapped, 15 ALR5th 39.

Availability of defense of duress or coercion in prosecution for violation of federal narcotics laws, 75 ALR Fed 722.

§ 6-1-103.
Civil recovery for criminal act; conviction as evidence in civil suit.

Nothing in this act prevents a party whose person or property is injured by a criminal act from recovering full damages.

No record of a conviction, unless it was obtained by confession in open court, shall be used as evidence in an action brought to recover damages.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following same catchline in notes to §

6-1-101

.

Applied

in

Haley v. Dreesen, 532 P.2d 399,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For note on indirect legal consequences of a conviction for a felony, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 62 (1958).

As to admissibility under Fed. R. Evid. 410 of pleas not withdrawn as evidence in a subsequent civil action, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).